Arkansas, session 2025, HB1976.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 14 is amended to add an additional
chapter to read as follows:
CHAPTER 365
VERTIPORTS

Subchapter 1 — General Provisions [Reserved.]

Subchapter 2 — Open Access to Public-Use Vertiports Act

14-365-201. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Open Access to
Public-Use Vertiports Act".

14-365-202. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) "Political subdivision" means a county, municipality, or any
*ZRC118*
04/02/2025 1:01:56 PM ZRC118

HB1976
other unit of local government in the state;
(2) "Public-use vertiport" means a vertiport that is:
(A) Intended to be used for public purposes;
(B) Under the control of a public agency; and
(C) Located on property that is publicly owned; and
(3) "Vertiport" means infrastructure or a system with supporting
services and equipment intended for the take-off, landing, and ground-
handling of crewed or uncrewed vertical take-off and landing aircraft,
including without limitation a:
(A) Public-use airport; and
(B) Private airport.

14-365-203. Purpose.
It is the policy of the state to promote the development of a network
of public-use vertiports that will provide equitable access to citizens of
this state who may benefit from advanced air mobility operations for cargo
and passenger service and to avoid any public-use vertiport monopolization or
discrimination by:
(1) Funding the planning for and construction of vertiports with
funding appropriated by the General Assembly;
(2) Encouraging local zoning and other land use authorities to
ensure an adequate number and a varied location of public-use vertiports to
serve citizens throughout the state; and
(3) Promoting competition and equity of access by prohibiting
the state or a political subdivision from granting an exclusive right of
access to one (1) or more vertiport operators at any public-use vertiport.

14-365-204. Applicability.
This subchapter applies to a vertiport that is operated by an advanced
air mobility operator authorized by the Federal Aviation Administration to
engage in passenger or cargo services in scheduled or nonscheduled service in
or affecting interstate commerce.

14-365-205. Vertiport safety.
(a) Each vertiport design shall comply with any rule or advisory
circular published by the Federal Aviation Administration that contains
04/02/2025 1:01:56 PM ZRC118

HB1976
standards for vertiport design and performance characteristics.
(b) A vertiport owner or operator shall submit a vertiport layout plan
to the Administrator of the Federal Aviation Administration in the form and
manner determined by the administrator, and operations shall not be conducted
at the vertiport until the vertiport layout plan is approved by the
administrator.

14-365-206. Prohibited zoning.
(a) A political subdivision shall not use its zoning and land use
authority to grant or permit an exclusive right to one (1) or more vertiport
owners or operators.
(b) A political subdivision shall use its zoning and land use
authority to promote reasonable access to advanced air mobility operators and
public-use vertiports within the jurisdiction of the political subdivision.

14-365-207. Subchapter supplemental — Severability.
(a) This subchapter is supplemental to any provision of federal law
pertaining to the design, construction, operation, or maintenance of a
vertiport designed or constructed with a grant under 49 U.S.C. § 47101 et
seq.
(b) A provision of this subchapter found in conflict with or otherwise
preempted by federal law shall be null and void without invalidating any
other provision of this subchapter, and to this end the provisions of this
subchapter are severable.












04/02/2025 1:01:56 PM ZRC118